Hawaii, session 2026, HB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 206M, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§206M-     Hawaii economic diversification grant program.  (a)  Section 41 (with respect to the credit for increasing research activities) and section 280C(c) (with respect to certain expenses for which the credit for increasing research activities are allowable) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall be operative for the purposes of this section; provided that the federal tax provisions in section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as that section was enacted on December 31, 2011, irrespective of any subsequent changes to section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall remain in effect for purposes of determining the grant under this section and apply only to expenses incurred for qualified research activities after December 31, 2012. (b)  All references to section 41 and 280C(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall be operative for purposes of this section; provided that references to the base amount in section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, shall not apply and credit for all qualified research expenses may be taken without regard to the amount of expenses for previous years. (c)  There shall be allowed to each qualified high technology business a grant for qualified research activities equal to the credit for research activities provided by section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and as modified by this section; provided that in addition to any other requirements established in this section, in order to qualify for the grant, the qualified high technology business shall also claim a federal tax credit for the same qualified research activities under section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, as enacted on December 31, 2011, irrespective of any subsequent amendments to section 41 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. (d)  Every qualified high technology business, before March 31 of each year in which qualified research activity was conducted in the previous taxable year, shall submit a written, certified statement to the department of business, economic development, and tourism identifying: (1)  Qualified expenditures, if any, expended in the previous taxable year; and (2)  The amount of qualified grants claimed pursuant to this section, if any, in the previous taxable year. (e)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall: (1)  Maintain records of the names and addresses of the qualified high technology businesses claiming the grant under this section and the total amount of the qualified research activity costs upon which the grant is based; (2)  Verify the nature of the qualifying research activity and amount of the qualifying costs or expenditures; (3)  Total all qualifying and cumulative costs or expenditures that the department certifies; and (4)  Certify the amount of the grants for each taxable year and cumulative amount of the grants. Upon each determination made under this subsection, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall issue a certificate to the qualified high technology business verifying information submitted to the department, including the qualifying costs or expenditure amounts, grant amount certified for each taxable year, and cumulative amount of the grant during the grant period.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may assess and collect a fee to offset the costs of certifying the grant claimed under this section. (f)  If in any taxable year the annual amount of certified grants reaches $10,000,000 in the aggregate, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall immediately discontinue certifying the grants.  In no instance shall the department of business, economic development, and tourism certify a total amount of grants exceeding $10,000,000. To comply with this restriction, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall certify grants on a first come, first served basis. (g)  A qualified high technology business that claims the grant under this section shall complete and file with the department of business, economic development, and tourism, through the department's website, an annual survey on electronic forms prepared and prescribed by the department.  The annual survey shall be filed before June 30 of each calendar year following the calendar year in which the grant may be claimed under this section.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may adjust the due date of the annual survey by rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91. (h)  The annual survey shall include the following information for the time period or periods specified by the department of business, economic development, and tourism: (1)  Identification of the following industry sector or sectors in which the qualified high technology business conducts business: (A)  The development and design of computer software for ultimate commercial sale, lease, or license, or to be otherwise marketed, for economic consideration; (B)  Biotechnology; (C)  Performing arts products; (D)  Sensor and optic technologies; (E)  Ocean sciences; (F)  Astronomy; (G)  Nonfossil fuel energy-related technology; (H)  Energy; (I)  Aerospace and defense; (J)  Nanotechnology; (K)  Artificial intelligence; (L)  Sensors and communication systems; (M)  Health; (N)  Medical; (O)  Therapeutics; (P)  United States Food and Drug Administration authorized or approved drugs, therapies, medical devices, and medical tests; and (Q)  Other health care technologies; (2)  Total expenditures and the qualified expenditures, if any, expended in the previous taxable year; (3)  Revenue and expense data, including a breakdown of any licensing royalty or other forms of income generated from intellectual property; (4)  Hawaii employment and wage data, including the numbers of full-time and part-time employees retained, new jobs, temporary positions, external services procured by the business, and payroll taxes; (5)  Filed intellectual property, including invention disclosures, provisional patents, and patents issued or granted; and (6)  The number of new companies spun out or established to commercialize the intellectual property owned by the qualified high technology business. The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall request information in each of these categories sufficient to measure the effectiveness of the grant under this section.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism may request any additional information necessary to measure the effectiveness of the grant, such as information related to patents.  In preparing the survey and requesting any additional information, the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall ensure that qualified high technology businesses are not subject to duplicative reporting requirements. (i)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall: (1)  Use information collected under this section and through its other reporting requirements to prepare summary descriptive statistics by category.  The information shall be reported at the aggregate level to prevent compromising identities of qualified high technology business investors or other confidential information; (2)  Identify each qualified high technology business that applies for or is the beneficiary of grants claimed under this section; and (3)  Report the information required under this subsection to the legislature by September 1 of each year. (j)  The department of business, economic development, and tourism, in collaboration with the department of taxation, shall use the information collected to study the effectiveness of the grant under this section.  The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall submit a report to the legislature on the following: (1)  The amount of grants claimed and total taxes paid by qualified high technology businesses; (2)  The number of qualified high technology businesses in each industry sector; (3)  The numbers and types of jobs created by qualified high technology businesses; (4)  External services and materials procured by the businesses; (5)  The compensation levels of jobs provided by qualified high technology businesses; (6)  Qualified research activities; and (7)  Any other factors the department of business, economic development, and tourism deems relevant. The department of business, economic development, and tourism shall submit the report to the legislature by September 1 of each year. (k)  As used in this section: "Qualified high technology business" means a small business that conducts more than fifty per cent of its activities in qualified research in the State and is registered to do business in the State. "Qualified research" has the same meaning as in section 41(d) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. "Qualified research expenses" has the same meaning as in section 41(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. "Qualified research expenses" does not include research expenses incurred outside of the State. "Small business" means a company with no more than five hundred employees." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii economic diversification grant program established by section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.